Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 37 Declaratory Judgments
§ 1-37-103.
Right of interested party to have determination made.

Any person interested under a deed, will, written contract or other writings constituting a contract, or whose rights, status or other legal relations are affected by the Wyoming constitution or by a statute, municipal ordinance, contract or franchise, may have any question of construction or validity arising under the instrument determined and obtain a declaration of rights, status or other legal relations.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 50, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 89-2402; C.S. 1945, § 3-5802; W.S. 1957, § 1-1052; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-38-103

.

Construction. —

To accomplish its purpose, the Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act is to be liberally construed and administered. Barber v. City of Douglas, 931 P.2d 948,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1997).

The University of Wyoming and the board of trustees of that institution are immune from suit

under the Declaratory Judgments Act. Retail Clerks Local 187 v. University of Wyoming, 531 P.2d 884,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 1975) (decided prior to enactment of the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act).

State, its agencies and its officers may not raise defense of sovereign immunity

to actions under the Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act (§§

1-37-101

through

1-37-115

); provided that, if such actions also concern those contract and tort claims which are the subject of the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, the procedural aspects of that act must be met. Rocky Mountain Oil & Gas Ass'n v. State, 645 P.2d 1163,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 345

(Wyo. 1982).

Determination of liabilities. —

This section permits not only construction, but determination of rights and liabilities under contract. Holly Sugar Corp. v. Fritzler, 42 Wyo. 446, 296 P. 206,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1931).

Section applicable to insurance contracts. —

Where the declaratory judgment statute applies to “any written contract or other writings constituting a contract,” insurance contracts come within the purview of the statute. Mountain W. Farm Bureau Mut. Ins. Co. v. Hallmark Ins. Co., 561 P.2d 706,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 237

(Wyo. 1977).

Controversy must be justiciable. —

The mandate of this section to the effect that a party who seeks a declaration of his or her “rights, status, or other legal relations” under a contract must first show his interest is but an expression of the basic declaratory judgment law requirement, which denies access to the services of the chapter unless the parties' controversy is real and not merely imagined — in other words, it must be justiciable. Mountain W. Farm Bureau Mut. Ins. Co. v. Hallmark Ins. Co., 561 P.2d 706,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 237

(Wyo. 1977).

The “interest” requirement is but an expression of the basic doctrine that the judiciary will not invoke its remedial powers unless presented with a justiciable controversy; numerous doctrines have evolved under the justiciability umbrella, including the doctrine of mootness, and the central question in a mootness case is whether decision of a once living dispute continues to be justified by a sufficient prospect that the decision will have an impact on the parties. Reiman Corp. v. City of Cheyenne, 838 P.2d 1182,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1992).

Trial court properly dismissed property owners'
declaratory judgment action against the State Engineer and the Board of Control because the action was not justiciable; even if the case presented a matter of great public importance, the Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

1-37-101

through

1-37-115

, did not extend the jurisdiction of the district court and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-37-103

specifically required that an interested person present an appropriate right for declaration before the district court could assume jurisdiction.
William F. West Ranch, LLC v. Tyrrell, 2009 WY 62, 206 P.3d 722,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. 2009).

Standing to challenge term limit law. —

Secretary of State's claim that
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

22-5-103

violated his right to be a candidate involved a matter of great public importance, and the usual requirements for showing a justiciable controversy under the Declaratory Judgment Act could be relaxed. Additionally, the proceedings were genuinely adverse in character because the Secretary was prohibited from seeking a third term; therefore, the Secretary had established a justiciable controversy.
Maxfield v. State, 2013 WY 14, 294 P.3d 895,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2013).

Standing to challenge zoning regulation. —

Real estate development partnership had standing to challenge the validity of a county zoning regulation that required it to obtain approval of its plan to sell 40-acre parcels of the land that the partnership had contracted to buy because even though the partnership was not yet the record owner, it had a “tangible interest” pursuant to its purchase contract and because the county had indicated that it intended to enforce the zoning regulation. The partnership met the four-part test required to pursue a declaratory judgment action. Pedro/Aspen, Ltd. v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2004 WY 84, 94 P.3d 412,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 2004).

Judgment available to construe lease provision requiring lessees
to transfer liquor license. —

A declaratory judgment was available to construe the provision of a lease containing the requirement that the lessees transfer their liquor license to the lessor at the conclusion of the lease. Such a provision was valid and enforceable as between the parties, but was subject to the provisions of § 12-4-601(b), requiring a public hearing and approval by the licensing authority. Kurpjuweit v. Northwestern Dev. Co., 708 P.2d 39,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 584

(Wyo. 1985).

No justiciable issue. —

A justiciable issue cannot be structured out of the mere request of a liability insurance company, which does not place its own policy in evidence, to have a defendant insurance company declared liable to a potential claimant under the terms of the defendant's policy. Mountain W. Farm Bureau Mut. Ins. Co. v. Hallmark Ins. Co., 561 P.2d 706,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 237

(Wyo. 1977).

Standing to challenge ordinances.—

District court erred in determining that the property owners lacked standing to bring their declaratory judgment actions against the town and a consultant where their claims as to their rights as affected by the sewage facility ordinances and connection and usage fees fell with the general scope of the Declaratory Judgment Act, and the complaint sufficiently alleged a tangible interest that had been harmed and that a judicial decision would have remedied that harm. Tavern, LLC v. Town of Alpine, 2017 WY 56, 395 P.3d 167,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2017).

Dismissal proper where issues the same as in pending criminal
action. —

Because a hunter's declaratory judgment action presented the same issues as the hunter's pending criminal action, the trial court did not err in dismissing the declaratory judgment action. Heilig v. Wyo. Game & Fish Comm'n, 2003 WY 27, 64 P.3d 734,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 2003).

Standing to challenge term limit law. —

State legislators and electors had standing to bring a declaratory judgment action challenging a term limit law; without immediate judicial attention, the legislators would have been unable to seek reelection and the electors would have been unable to cast a ballot for those legislators. Cathcart v. Meyer, 2004 WY 49, 88 P.3d 1050,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 2004).

Tax matters. —

Under review of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-37-109

, an owner of natural gas wells was properly granted declaratory judgment under the Uniform Declaratory Judgment Act , finding that the Department of Revenue had no authority to change the valuation methodology for production taxes and royalties without complying with the notice provisions of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-14-203(b). Exhaustion of remedies was not required, and the primary jurisdiction doctrine did not apply because only questions of law were presented.
Wyo. Dep't of Revenue v. Exxon Mobil Corp., 2007 WY 21, 150 P.3d 1216,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2007).

Construction of contracts. —

This section specifically provides for declaratory relief actions to be initiated for the purpose of construing contract provisions. Pribble v. State Farm Mut. Auto. Ins. Co., 933 P.2d 1108,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 933 P.2d 1108,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1997).

Landowners presented a justiciable controversy in filing their complaint seeking a declaratory judgment to settle their rights to water use under their contracts with the town; the case was one of contract construction, not the construction of any right to use water under a permit and appropriation system. Barber v. City of Douglas, 931 P.2d 948,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1997).

Appellees'
action fell within the scope of the Wyoming Uniform Declaratory Judgment Act because they sought to have the court construe their rights as owners of property in a subdivision; language used in a plat was considered in accordance with contract interpretation principles.
Carnahan v. Lewis, 2012 WY 45, 273 P.3d 1065,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2012).

Construction of wills. —

Under this chapter district courts have power, upon petition of any person interested, to determine any question of construction or validity arising under a will, to declare rights, status or other legal relations thereunder, and to determine any question arising in administration of an estate. Murrell v. Stock Growers' Nat'l Bank, 74 F.2d 827, 1934 U.S. App. LEXIS 4018 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1934).

Annexation of land. —

Under this section of the Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act, landowners had standing to bring a declaratory judgment regarding a municipal ordinance because (1) a justiciable controversy existed, (2) they had an interest in the matter because the annexation brought their land within the city's control, (3) the annexation of the land in question facilitated the annexation of the landowners' property, and (4) a judgment of the court would resolve the controversy. Cox v. City of Cheyenne, 2003 WY 146, 79 P.3d 500,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2003).

Exchange of school lands. —

A controversy over the constitutionality of exchanges of state lands without a public auction involved precisely the type of circumstance contemplated by the Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act, for (1) this controversy impacted many stakeholders, including state-school-land lessees, the beneficiaries of the funds generated by state school lands, the legislature which had adopted statutes authorizing exchanges, those members of the executive branch of state government whose responsibility was to steward the state school lands, and the public at large; and (2) as inevitable growth and development increased the pressure on Wyoming state lands, the need for certainty and clarity regarding this aspect of the management of state lands grew.Dir. of the Office of State Lands & Invs. v. Merbanco, Inc., 2003 WY 73, 70 P.3d 241,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. July 10, 2003).

Mining exploration permit. —

Dismissal under W.R.C.P. 12(b)(6) was proper where agricultural landowners had not made any effort to seek relief with the county board of commissioners, which was the administrative agency responsible for administering the county zoning resolution pertaining to mineral exploration permit requirements, and instead sought to enforce the zoning resolution through a declaratory judgment action against the mining companies under this section. Quinn Revocable Trust v. SRW, Inc., 2004 WY 65, 91 P.3d 146,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 2004).

Applied

in

State ex rel. Christopulos v. Husky Oil Co., 575 P.2d 262,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 268

(Wyo. 1978); Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1980); Cotton v. Brow, 903 P.2d 530,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1995).

Quoted

in

Tobin v. Pursel, 539 P.2d 361,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1975); Bragg v. Marion, 663 P.2d 505,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 320

(Wyo. 1983); DeWitt v. Balben, 718 P.2d 854,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 539

(Wyo. 1986); West Tex. Utils. Co. v. Exxon Coal USA, Inc., 807 P.2d 932,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1991); Ford v. Board of County Comm'rs, 924 P.2d 91,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1996); Jackson Hole Mt. Resort Corp. v. Alpenhof Lodge Assocs., 2005 WY 46, 109 P.3d 555,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(2005); City of Torrington v. Smith, 2016 WY 126, 386 P.3d 336,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 2016).

Stated

in

Simons v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 741 P.2d 1116,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1987); Rock v. Lankford, 2013 WY 61,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(May 17, 2013).

Cited

in

Hopper v. All Pet Animal Clinic, Inc., 861 P.2d 531,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1993); Brockway v. Brockway, 921 P.2d 1104,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1996); Sheridan Retirement Partners v. City of Sheridan, 950 P.2d 554,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1997); Snake River Brewing Co. v. Town of Jackson, 2002 WY 11, 39 P.3d 397,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2002); Pullar v. Huelle, 2003 WY 90, 73 P.3d 1038,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 2003); Lozier v. Blattland Invs., LLC, 2004 WY 132, 100 P.3d 380,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(2004); Laughter v. Bd. of County Comm'rs for Sweetwater County, 2005 WY 54,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 60

, 110 P.3d 875 (2005).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Water Law—Indian Law—Cowboys, Indians and Reserved
Water Rights: May a State Court Limit How Indian Tribes Use Their
Water?
In re The General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in the Big Horn River System and All Other Sources, State of Wyoming, 835 P.2d 273,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 467 (1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Tax question as proper subject of action for declaratory judgment, 11 ALR2d 359.

Unemployment compensation, 14 ALR2d 826.

Declaratory judgment as to validity of lease, 60 ALR2d 400.

Declaratory judgment, during lifetime of spouses, as to construction of antenuptial agreement dealing with property rights of survivor, 80 ALR2d 941.

Breach of lessor's covenant against use of his other property in competition with lessee-covenantee, 97 ALR2d 4.

Validity, construction and application of criminal statutes or ordinances as proper subject for declaratory judgment, 10 ALR3d 727.

Availability and scope of declaratory judgment action in determining rights of parties or powers and exercise thereof by arbitrators under arbitration agreements, 12 ALR3d 854.

§ 1-37-104.
Contract may be construed at any time.

A contract may be construed
either before or after there has been a breach thereof.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 50, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 89-2403; C.S. 1945, § 3-5803; W.S. 1957, § 1-1053; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-38-104

.

Quoted

in

West Tex. Utils. Co. v. Exxon Coal USA, Inc., 807 P.2d 932,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1991); State Ex Rel. Arnold v. Ommen, 2009 WY 24, 201 P.3d 1127,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Feb. 24, 2009).

Cited

in

Holly Sugar Corp. v. Fritzler, 42 Wyo. 446, 296 P. 206,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(1931).

§ 1-37-105.
Fiduciary's rights to be construed.

Any person interested as or through an executor, administrator, trustee, guardian or other fiduciary, creditor, devisee, legatee, heir, next of kin, or beneficiary of a trust, in the administration of a trust, or of the estate of a decedent, a minor or person under legal disability, may have a declaration of rights or other legal relations in respect thereto:

To ascertain any class of creditors, devisees, legatees, heirs, next of kin or others;

To direct the executors, administrators or trustees to do or abstain from doing any particular act in their fiduciary capacity; or

To determine any question arising in the administration of the estate or trust, including questions of construction of wills and other writings.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 50, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 89-2404; C.S. 1945, § 3-5804; W.S. 1957, § 1-1054; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-38-105

.

Cross references. —

As to minors as parties to actions, see §

1-1-102

.

As to age of majority, see §

14-1-101

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Declaratory judgment in probate case. —

Although it is more regular and desirable that an action for declaratory judgment be initiated in the district court under the usual civil procedures, there would seem to be no prohibition or valid objection to an action seeking a declaration of heirship being initiated by the district court in its probate arm. In re Estate of Lonquest, 526 P.2d 994,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 235

(Wyo. 1974).

Construction of wills. —

Under this chapter district courts have power, upon petition of any person interested, to determine any question of construction or validity arising under a will, to declare rights, status or other legal relations thereunder, and to determine any question arising in administration of an estate. Murrell v. Stock Growers' Nat'l Bank, 74 F.2d 827, 1934 U.S. App. LEXIS 4018 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1934).

§ 1-37-106.
Adjudication of water rights.

The state of Wyoming upon the relation of the attorney general may institute an action to have determined in a general adjudication the nature, extent, and relative priority of the water rights of all persons in any river system and all other sources, provided:

For the purposes of this section:

The term “general adjudication” shall mean the judicial determination or establishment of the extent and priority of the rights to use water of all persons on any river system and all other sources within the state of Wyoming. The court conducting such a general adjudication shall:

Certify to the state board of control those legal and factual issues which the court deems appropriate for the board to determine. Upon such certification, the board shall exercise those powers and follow those procedures set forth in Rule 53 of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure;

Confirm those rights evidenced by previous court decrees, or by certificates of appropriation, or by certificates of construction heretofore issued by the Wyoming state board of control;

Determine the status of all uncancelled permits to acquire the right to the use of the water of the state of Wyoming and adjudicate all perfected rights thereunder not theretofore adjudicated under W.S.

41-4-511

;

Determine the extent and priority date of and adjudicate any interest in or right to use the water of the river system and all other sources not otherwise represented by the aforedescribed decrees, certificates, or permits;

Establish, in whatever form determined to be most appropriate by the court, one or more tabulations or lists of all water rights and their relative priorities on the river system and all other sources.

The word “person” shall be construed to mean an individual, a partnership, a corporation, a municipality, the state of Wyoming, the United States of America, or any other legal entity, public or private.

When the potential defendants number one thousand (1,000) or more, personal service of a summons and complaint shall not be required and (A) the court shall order that the clerk obtain service on known potential defendants by mailing a court-approved notice of the action by certified mail, return receipt requested, and (B) the court shall order that the clerk obtain service on all unknown parties by publication of said notice for four (4) consecutive weeks in a newspaper published in each of the counties within which interests in and rights to the use of water may be affected by the adjudication. If there is no newspaper in one (1) or more of said counties, then publication for such counties shall be in one (1) or more newspapers published in the state, and of general circulation within said counties. If publication is in a daily newspaper, one (1) insertion a week shall be sufficient;

The complaint for such a general adjudication shall be captioned: “In re the General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in the . . . . . River System and All Other Sources, State of Wyoming”;

When the water rights to be determined are located in more than one (1) county, the general adjudication may be brought in any of the counties.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 2, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-1054.1.

Cross references. —

As to board of control, see §

41-4-201

.

Editor's notes. —

Section 1-1054.1, W.S. 1957, which was enacted by § 1, ch. 2, Laws 1977, has been inserted as §

1-37-106

and the subsequent sections, enacted by § 1, ch. 188, Laws 1977, have been redesignated accordingly. Also, because of chapter renumbering, the sections in the chapter appear as §§

1-37-101

to

1-37-115

instead of §§

1-38-101

to 1-38-114 as originally enacted.

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Waiver shown. —

Owner's predecessor-in-interest
waived any right he had to water under a canal permit when, in order
to obtain a ditch enlargement permit, the predecessor submitted an
affidavit requesting a canal permit be cancelled; that decision was
made final when a ditch enlargement certificate of appropriation was
issued in 1922. Abandonment was not shown because there was no formal
abandonment or forfeiture procedure, as contemplated by prior and
current law. General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in the Big Horn River Sys. & All Other Sources v. State, 2015 WY 104, 355 P.3d 1222,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2015).

No bar against adjudicating Indian water rights. —

Article 21, § 26 of the Wyoming Constitution only bars state jurisdiction over Indian water rights when federal law also bars that jurisdiction. Congress' policy under the federal McCarran Amendment is to allow state courts to adjudicate Indian water rights as part of general stream adjudications. Because of the McCarran Amendment, there is no federal law which prevents the state from adjudicating the Indian water rights on the Big Horn River System. In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 753 P.2d 76,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1988), aff'd, 492 U.S. 406, 109 S. Ct. 2994, 106 L. Ed. 2d 342, 1989 U.S. LEXIS 3173 (U.S. 1989), cert. denied, 492 U.S. 926, 109 S. Ct. 3265, 106 L. Ed. 2d 610, 1989 U.S. LEXIS 3337 (U.S. 1989), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Adjudication of water rights under this section is final and binding.

Claimants have several avenues available to them should unforeseen future problems develop, such as Rule 60, W.R.C.P., and §

1-37-110

(supplemental relief). The court does not need to retain jurisdiction as a “safety net.” In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 753 P.2d 76,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1988), aff'd, 492 U.S. 406, 109 S. Ct. 2994, 106 L. Ed. 2d 342, 1989 U.S. LEXIS 3173 (U.S. 1989), cert. denied, 492 U.S. 926, 109 S. Ct. 3265, 106 L. Ed. 2d 610, 1989 U.S. LEXIS 3337 (U.S. 1989), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

And state engineer allowed to monitor rights. —

The provisions in a stream adjudication decree, authorizing the state engineer to monitor Indian reserved water rights, were proper, as they contemplated neither the application of state law nor the authority to deprive the Tribes of water without the assistance of the courts in a suit for the administration of the decree. The role of the state engineer was not to apply state law, but to enforce the reserved rights against state appropriators, as decreed under principles of federal law. In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 753 P.2d 76,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1988), aff'd, 492 U.S. 406, 109 S. Ct. 2994, 106 L. Ed. 2d 342, 1989 U.S. LEXIS 3173 (U.S. 1989), cert. denied, 492 U.S. 926, 109 S. Ct. 3265, 106 L. Ed. 2d 610, 1989 U.S. LEXIS 3337 (U.S. 1989), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Prior adjudication. —

Petition to intervene brought by irrigators to adjudicate water rights was properly dismissed by the district court, pursuant to Rule 12(b)(6), W.R.C.P., as the matter was barred by res judicata and the petition was untimely. The disputed reservoir certificates were originally adjudicated in 1963. In re General Adjudication of All Rights to use Water in the Big Horn River System, 2004 WY 21, 85 P.3d 981,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2004).

Cited

in

In re The General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in the Big Horn River System and All Other Sources, State of Wyoming, 835 P.2d 273,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1992); In re The General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in the Big Horn River System and All Other Sources, State of Wyoming, 899 P.2d 848,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1995); Wyoming v. United States, 933 F. Supp. 1030, 1996 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 11526 (D. Wyo. 1996); In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 2002 WY 89,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 93

, 48 P.3d 1040 (Wyo. 2002); Ultra Res., Inc. v. Hartman, 2015 WY 40,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Mar. 19, 2015).

Law reviews. —

For discussion of the Wyoming general adjudication statute, see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 457 (1977).

For comment, “McCarran Amendment General Adjudications in Wyoming: Threshold Problems,” see XVI Land & Water L. Rev. 53 (1981).

For Comment, “Wyoming's Experience With Federal Non-Indian Reserved Rights: The Big Horn Adjudication,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 433 (1986).

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).

For case note, “Water Law — Quantification of Federal Reserve Indian Water Rights — ‘Practicably Irrigated Acreage’ Under Fire: The Search for a Better Legal Standard. In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 753 P.2d 76,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1988), aff'd, 492 U.S. 406, 106 L. Ed. 2d 342, 109 S. Ct. 2994, 1989 U.S. LEXIS 3173 (1989), cert. denied, 492 U.S. 926, 109 S. Ct. 3265, 106 L. Ed. 2d 610, 1989 U.S. LEXIS 3337 (1989), overruled on other grounds, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998),” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 417 (1990).

For case note, “WATER LAW — Drawing the Line on Indian Reserved Water Rights: No ‘Super-Walton’ Rights in Wyoming's Big Horn River System. In re The General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in the Big Horn River System and All Other Sources, State of Wyoming, 899 P.2d 848,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1995),” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 425 (1996)

§ 1-37-107.
Enumeration not exclusive.

The enumeration in W.S.

1-37-103

through

1-37-106

does not limit or restrict the exercise of the general
powers conferred in W.S.

1-37-102

in any proceeding where declaratory relief is sought,
in which a judgment or decree will terminate the controversy or remove
an uncertainty.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 50, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 89-2405; C.S. 1945, § 3-5805; W.S. 1957, § 1-1055; Laws 1977, ch. 2, § 2; ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-38-106.

Actions not covered. —

A declaratory judgment will not be entered when action involves damages, and in which right to a removal to the federal court exists. Beatty v. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R., 49 Wyo. 22, 52 P.2d 404,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1935).

Personal service contracts. —

Under general rule, except where employee's services are unique and extraordinary, specific performance, or the correlative right of injunction, will not be granted to enforce a contract for personal services and only remedy is for damages. Beatty v. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R., 49 Wyo. 22, 52 P.2d 404,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1935).

Sovereign immunity does not apply in actions between governmental
entities. —

This act does not invoke sovereign immunity principles for actions against governmental agencies or specify restrictions to determine the rights or the award of appropriate relief between segments of Wyoming government. Board of County Comm'rs v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. No. One, 884 P.2d 946,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1994).

Applied

in

Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1980).

Cited

in

Holly Sugar Corp. v. Fritzler, 42 Wyo. 446, 296 P. 206,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(1931).

Stated

in

Rock v. Lankford, 2013 WY 61,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(May 17, 2013).

Law reviews. —

For discussion of the Wyoming general adjudication statute, see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 457 (1977).

§ 1-37-108.
Discretionary power retained by court.

The court may refuse
to render a declaratory judgment where the judgment would not terminate
the uncertainty or controversy giving rise to the proceeding.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 50, § 6; R.S. 1931, § 89-2406; C.S. 1945, § 3-5806; W.S. 1957, § 1-1056; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-38-107.

Discretion. —

Under this section, the trial court has wide discretionary powers. This discretion is not an arbitrary one, but one which should be based upon sound legal principle. The court in the exercise of such discretion is not required to render a futile judgment that would not terminate any uncertainty or controversy or render advisory opinions. Wyoming Humane Soc'y v. Port, 404 P.2d 834,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1965).

District court has broad latitude to decide whether declaratory relief is appropriate.

West Tex. Utils. Co. v. Exxon Coal USA, 807 P.2d 932,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1991).

Uncertainty. —

It was proper to refuse declaration where it would leave the parties uncertain as to their rights as to matters not before the court. Ziegler v. Pickett, 46 Wyo. 283, 25 P.2d 391,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1933).

Under this section a declaration may be refused unless it will terminate uncertainty. Ziegler v. Pickett, 46 Wyo. 283, 25 P.2d 391,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1933).

Terminable controversy. —

Declaration may be refused unless it appears that a decision, whichever way it may go, will terminate the uncertainty or controversy. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

Bringing in parties. —

Where mere personal judgment was asked, court did not abuse its discretion in refusing to have other parties brought in. Holly Sugar Corp. v. Fritzler, 42 Wyo. 446, 296 P. 206,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1931).

Actions not covered. —

A declaratory judgment will not be entered when action involves damages, and in which right to a removal to the federal court exists. Beatty v. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R., 49 Wyo. 22, 52 P.2d 404,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1935).

Stated

in

Brimmer v. Thomson, 521 P.2d 574,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1974); Bird v. Rozier, 948 P.2d 888,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 1997).

§ 1-37-109.
Review.

Final orders and judgments
entered in declaratory judgment proceedings may be reviewed as in
other civil actions.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 50, § 7; R.S. 1931, § 89-2407; C.S. 1945, § 3-5807; W.S. 1957, § 1-1057; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-38-108.

Cross references. —

As to appeals, see Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Jurisdiction.—

Dismissal of an appeal was appropriate because a district court's order was not a final appealable order, as the court's order interpreted a trust provision and held that the Wyoming Probate Code, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

2-1-101

, governed the transfer of property to the trust, but did not grant the final report and accounting and petition for final decree that was filed by the decedent's spouse and did not determine the share of the estate that the heirs were entitled to receive, nor did it discharge the personal representative and close the estate. Inman v. Inman (In re Estate of Inman), 2016 WY 101, 382 P.3d 67,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 2016).

Review in declaratory judgment actions. —

Under review provided in this section, an owner of natural gas wells was properly granted declaratory judgment under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

1-37-103

,

1-37-114

, and

1-37-108

of the Uniform Declaratory Judgment Act, finding that the Department of Revenue had no authority to change the valuation methodology for production taxes and royalties without complying with the notice provisions of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-14-203(b). Exhaustion of remedies was not required, and the primary jurisdiction doctrine did not apply because only questions of law were presented.
Wyo. Dep't of Revenue v. Exxon Mobil Corp., 2007 WY 21, 150 P.3d 1216,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2007).

Quoted

in

Sherard v. Sherard, 2006 WY 105, 142 P.3d 673,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(2006); R.C.R., Inc. v. Deline, 2008 WY 96, 190 P.3d 140,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Aug. 15, 2008).

Stated

in

Brockway v. Brockway, 921 P.2d 1104,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

Ford v. Board of County Comm'rs, 924 P.2d 91,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1996).

§ 1-37-110.
Supplemental relief.

Further relief based
on a declaratory judgment may be granted. Application therefor shall
be by petition to a court having jurisdiction to grant the relief.
If the application is sufficient the court, on reasonable notice,
shall require any adverse party whose rights have been adjudicated
by the declaratory judgment to show cause why further relief should
not be granted.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 50, § 8; R.S. 1931, § 89-2408; C.S. 1945, § 3-5808; W.S. 1957, § 1-1058; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-38-109.

Jurisdiction.—

District court
had jurisdiction over a motion to enforce a judgment and net profits
contract pertaining to oil and gas leases under its inherent authority
to interpret and enforce its own judgment and the further relief provision
of the Wyoming Declaratory Judgments Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-37-101

et seq. While it would have been preferable for the statutory
procedure to have been followed, the failure did not impact the working
interest owners' procedural opportunities to contest the motion. Ultra Res., Inc. v. Hartman, 2015 WY 40, 346 P.3d 880,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2015).

No sovereign immunity between government segments. —

A sovereign immunity restriction will not be applied to the determination of rights or the award of appropriate relief between segments of the Wyoming government. Simons v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 741 P.2d 1116,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1987).

Adjudication of water
rights under §

1-37-106

is final and binding.

Claimants
have several avenues available to them should unforeseen future problems
develop, such as Rule 60, W.R.C.P., and this section. The court does
not need to retain jurisdiction as a “safety net.”
In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 753 P.2d 76,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1988), aff'd, 492 U.S. 406, 109 S. Ct. 2994, 106 L. Ed. 2d 342, 1989 U.S. LEXIS 3173 (U.S. 1989), cert. denied, 492 U.S. 926, 109 S. Ct. 3265, 106 L. Ed. 2d 610, 1989 U.S. LEXIS 3337 (U.S. 1989), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Declaratory action regarding whether covenant ran with the
land. —

District court ruled that an area of mutual interest clause in a mineral lease contract, executed only by the lessor and lessee, did not run with the land and was not binding on successors in interest. Summary judgment granting the lessee's claim for declaratory relief that no royalties were due from any successor in interest was granted. Mt. W. Mines, Inc. v. Cleveland-Cliffs Iron Co., 376 F. Supp. 2d 1298, 2005 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14152 (D. Wyo. 2005), aff'd in part and rev'd in part, 470 F.3d 947, 2006 U.S. App. LEXIS 28957 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2006).

Quoted

in

Allen v. Allen, 550 P.2d 1137,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 1976).

Cited

in

In re The General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in the Big Horn River System and All Other Sources, State of Wyoming, 835 P.2d 273,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 1-37-111.
Determination of issues of fact.

When a declaratory judgment
proceeding involves the determination of an issue of fact, the issue
may be tried and determined as in other civil actions.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 50, § 9; R.S. 1931, § 89-2409; C.S. 1945, § 3-5809; W.S. 1957, § 1-1059; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-38-110.

Cross references. —

As to trial by jury, see chapter 11 of this title and Rules 38 and 39, W.R.C.P.

Jury trial is not a matter of right in all cases. —

What the supreme court said in Holly Sugar Corp. v. Fritzler, 42 Wyo. 446, 296 P. 206,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1931).

Demand jury. —

Defendants having failed to demand jury, could not complain. Holly Sugar Corp. v. Fritzler, 42 Wyo. 446, 296 P. 206,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1931).

Determination of facts by jury. —

That court, without jury, must determine applicability of rule against multiplicity of suits in actions under provisions of this chapter, does not preclude determination of facts by jury. Holly Sugar Corp. v. Fritzler, 42 Wyo. 446, 296 P. 206,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1931).

Quoted

in

R.C.R., Inc. v. Deline, 2008 WY 96, 190 P.3d 140,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Aug. 15, 2008).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right to jury trial in action for declaratory relief in state court, 33 ALR4th 146.

§ 1-37-112.
Costs.

The court may award costs
in any proceeding as seem equitable and just.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 50, § 10; R.S. 1931, § 89-2410; C.S. 1945, § 3-5810; W.S. 1957, § 1-1060; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-38-111.

Cross references. —

As to costs generally, see chapter 14 of this title.